Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3241.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The town of Narragansett is hereby empowered, in addition to authority
previously granted, to issue bonds in an amount not exceeding three million dollars ($3,000,000)
from time to time under its corporate name and seal or a facsimile of such seal. The bonds of each
issue may be issued in the form of serial bonds or term bonds or a combination thereof and shall be
payable either by maturity of principal in the case of serial bonds or by mandatory serial redemption
in the case of term bonds, in annual installments of principal, the first installment to be not later
than five (5) years and the last installment not later than thirty (30) years after the date of the bonds.
SECTION 2. The bonds shall be signed by the manual or facsimile signatures of the town
treasurer and the president of the town council and shall be issued and sold in such amounts as the
town council may authorize by resolution. The manner of sale, denominations, maturities, interest
rates and other terms, conditions and details of any bonds or notes issued under this act may be
fixed by the resolution of the town council authorizing the issue or by separate resolution of the
town council or, to the extent provisions for these matters are not so made, they may be fixed by
the officers authorized to sign the bonds or notes. The proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds
shall be delivered to the town treasurer, and such proceeds exclusive of premiums and accrued
interest shall be expended for: (1) The equipping, expansion, improvement and renovation of fire
stations in the town of Narragansett and all costs incidental thereto; (2) In payment of the principal

of or interest on temporary notes issued under Section 3 of this act; or (3) In repayment of advances
under Section 4 of this act. No purchaser of any bonds or notes under this act shall be in any way
responsible for the proper application of the proceeds derived from the sale thereof. The projects
shall be carried out and all contracts made therefore on behalf of the town by the town council or
as may be otherwise directed by the town council. The proceeds of bonds or notes issued under this
act, any applicable federal or state assistance and the other monies referred to in Section 6 of this
act shall be deemed appropriated for the purposes of this act without further action than that
required by this act. The bond issue authorized by this act may be consolidated for the purposes of
issuance and sale with any other bond issue of the town heretofore or hereafter authorized; provided
that, notwithstanding any such consolidation, the proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized
by this act shall be expended for the purposes set forth above.
SECTION 3. The town council may by resolution authorize the issue from time to time of
interest bearing or discounted notes in anticipation of the authorization or issue of bonds or in
anticipation of the receipt of federal or state aid for the purposes of this act. The amount of original
notes issued in anticipation of bonds may not exceed the amount of bonds which may be issued
under this act and the amount of original notes issued in anticipation of federal or state aid may not
exceed the amount of available federal or state aid as estimated by the treasurer. Temporary notes
issued hereunder shall be signed by the treasurer and by the president of the town council and shall
be payable within (5) five years from their respective dates, but the principal of and interest on
notes issued for a shorter period may be renewed or paid from time to time by the issue of other
notes hereunder; provided the period from the date of an original note to the maturity of any note
issued to renew or pay the same debt or the interest thereon shall not exceed (5) five years.
SECTION 4. Pending any authorization or issue of bonds hereunder or pending or in lieu
of any authorization or issue of notes hereunder, the treasurer, with the approval of the town
council, may, to the extent that bonds or notes may be issued hereunder, apply funds in the treasury
of the town to the purposes specified in Section 2, such advances to be repaid without interest from
the proceeds of bonds or notes subsequently issued or from the proceeds of applicable federal or
state assistance or from other available funds.
SECTION 5. Any proceeds of bonds or notes issued hereunder or of any applicable federal
or state assistance, pending their expenditure may be deposited or invested by the treasurer, in
demand deposits, time deposits or savings deposits in banks which are members of the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation or in obligations issued or guaranteed by the United States of
America or by any agency or instrumentality thereof or as may be provided in any other applicable
law of the State of Rhode Island.
LC006415 - Page 2 of 6

SECTION 6. Any accrued interest received upon the sale of bonds or notes hereunder shall
be applied to the payment of the first interest due thereon. Any premiums arising from the sale of
bonds or notes hereunder and any earnings or net profit realized from the deposit or investment of
funds hereunder shall, in the discretion of the treasurer, be applied to the cost of preparing, issuing
and marketing bonds or notes hereunder to the extent not otherwise provided, to the payment of the
cost of the projects or to the cost of additional improvements coming within the description of the
projects in Section 2 of this act, to the payment of the principal of or interest on bonds or notes
issued hereunder or to any one or more of the foregoing. The cost of preparing, issuing and
marketing bonds or notes hereunder may also, in the discretion of the treasurer, be met from bond
or note proceeds exclusive of accrued interest or from other monies available therefor. Any balance
of bond or note proceeds remaining after payment of the cost of the projects and said additional
improvements and the cost of preparing, issuing and marketing bonds or notes hereunder shall be
applied to the payment of the principal of or interest on bonds or notes issued hereunder. In
exercising any discretion under this section, the treasurer shall be governed by any instructions
adopted by resolution of the town council. The treasurer is authorized to take any action deemed
by him or her necessary: (1) To assure that interest on the bonds or notes issued hereunder remains
excludable from gross income of the recipients thereof for federal income tax purposes, including,
without limitation, paying to the federal government any rebate of earnings derived from the deposit
or investment of the proceeds of such bonds or notes that may be required therefor; (2) To sell the
bonds or notes under any financing program with the Rhode Island infrastructure bank; and (3) To
comply with the requirements of federal law, including without being limited to regulations and
other requirements of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the Municipal Securities
Rulemaking Board, imposed directly on the town or on the purchaser or underwriters of such bonds
and notes.
SECTION 7. All bonds or notes issued under this act and the debts evidenced thereby shall
be obligatory on the town in the same manner and to the same extent as other debts lawfully
contracted by it and shall be excepted from the operation of § 45-12-2. No such obligation shall at
any time be included in the debt of the town for the purpose of ascertaining its borrowing capacity.
The town shall annually appropriate a sum sufficient to pay the principal and interest coming due
within the year on bonds and notes issued hereunder to the extent that monies therefor are not
otherwise provided. If such sum is not appropriated, it shall nevertheless be added to the annual tax
levy. In order to provide such sum in each year and notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, all taxable property in the town shall be subject to ad valorem taxation by the town without
limitation as to rate or amount.
LC006415 - Page 3 of 6

SECTION 8. Any bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this act, if properly
executed by officers of the town in office on the date of execution, shall be valid and binding
according to their terms notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor any
or all of such officers shall for any reason have ceased to hold office.
SECTION 9. The town, acting by resolution of its town council, is authorized to apply for,
contract for and expend any federal or state advances or other grants or assistance which may be
available for the purposes of this act, and any such expenditures may be in addition to other monies
provided in this act. To the extent of any inconsistency between any law of this state and any
applicable federal law or regulation, the latter shall prevail. Federal and state advances, with interest
where applicable, whether contracted for prior to or after the effective date of this act, may be
repaid as project costs under Section 2.
SECTION 10. Bonds and notes may be issued under this act without obtaining the approval
of any governmental agency or the taking of any proceedings or the happening of any conditions
except as specifically required by this act for such issue. In carrying out any project financed, in
whole or in part, under this act, including where applicable the condemnation of any land or interest
in land, and in the levy and collection of assessments or other charges permitted by law on account
of any such project, all action shall be taken which is necessary to meet constitutional requirements
whether or not such action is otherwise required by statute; but the validity of bonds and notes
issued hereunder shall in no way depend upon the validity or occurrence of such action. To the
extent of any inconsistency between this act and the town charter, this act shall prevail.
SECTION 11. The question of the approval of this act shall be submitted to the electors of
the town at the general election on November 3, 2026. The question shall be submitted in
substantially the following form: "Shall an act, passed at the 2026 session of the General Assembly,
entitled “ AN ACT AUTHORIZING THE TOWN OF NARRAGANSETT TO FINANCE THE
EQUIPPING, EXPANSION, IMPROVEMENT AND RENOVATION OF FIRE STATIONS IN
THE TOWN OF NARRAGANSETT AND TO ISSUE NOT MORE THAN $3,000,000 BONDS
AND NOTES THEREFOR” be approved?" and the warning for the election shall contain the
question to be submitted. The town board of canvassers may combine any two (2) or more voting
districts for the election and when so combined shall be treated as a voting district. If so combined,
the town board of canvassers shall advertise the combination of districts in a newspaper of general
circulation in the town. From the time the election is warned and until it is held, it shall be the duty
of the town clerk to keep a copy of the act available at his or her office for public inspection, but
the validity of the election shall not be affected by this requirement.
SECTION 12. This section and Section 11 shall take effect upon passage. The remainder
LC006415 - Page 4 of 6

of this act shall take effect upon the approval of this act by a majority of those voting on the question
at the election prescribed by Section 11.
========
LC006415
========
LC006415 - Page 5 of 6